Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 23

AUDITOR

Part I. Office of Auditor Proper

Section

23-1 Definition

23-2 Auditor; appointment, tenure, removal

23-2.5 Acting auditor

23-3 Salary of the auditor and appropriations

23-3.5 Reimbursement moneys for financial audits

23-3.6 Audit revolving fund

23-4 Duties

23-5 Auditor; powers

23-6 Examination under oath

23-7 Discovery of irregularities

23-7.5 Audit recommendations; annual report

23-8 Assistance and staff

23-9 Reports

23-9.5 Confidentiality

23-10 Penalty for violation and false evidence

23-11 New special or revolving funds

23-12 Review of revolving and trust funds

23-13 Hawaii tourism authority; audit

Part II. Legislative Scientific Advisory

Committee--Repealed

23-21 to 27 Repealed

Part III. Legislative Economic Advisory

Council--Repealed

23-41 to 47 Repealed

Part IV. Social and Financial Assessment of
Proposed

Mandatory Health Insurance
Coverage

23-51 Proposed mandatory health insurance
coverage; impact

assessment report

23-52 Assessment report; contents

Part V. Legislative Advisory Committee

23-61 Purpose

23-62 Definition

23-63 Establishment

23-64 Composition; appointment

23-65 Term of appointment

23-66 Powers and duties

23-67 Expenses

Note

2050 sustainability plan; update every ten years. L Sp 2005,
c 8; L 2006, c 210, §2.

Pilot project for efficiency measures to be included with
budget documents submitted to the legislature; report to 2017 legislature;
auditor report (no later than March 1, 2017). L 2015, c 67.

State-county functions working group; 2015-2016 reports to
legislature, governor, mayors, and councils (repealed upon adjournment sine die
of 2016 regular session). L 2014, c 174, §2.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next